Colorado statutes. TITLE 2 Legislative
ARTICLE 5 COLORADO REVISED STATUTES
All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1973 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 13;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1980 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 1B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1982 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 16A;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1986 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 3A, 3B, 8A, 8B, 12A, and 12B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1987 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 4B, 6A, and 6B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1988 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 10A and 10B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1989 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 11A and 11B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1990 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 15;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1991 first extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 5A and 5B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1992 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 2;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1993 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 17;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1994 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 4A and 16B.

Volumes 9 and 14, 1995 replacement volumes. Volumes 9 and 14, 1995 replacement volumes, hereby designated and declared to be also a part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contain all the laws of a general and permanent nature of the state of Colorado for titles 22 and 23 which were revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, and in volume 9, 1988 replacement volume, and for titles 33 to 35 which were revised and reenacted in Colorado Revised Statutes 1973, and in volume 14, 1984 replacement volume, together with the 1994 supplements thereto and the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted by the sixtieth general assembly at its first regular session in 1995 pertaining thereto.

A copy of said supplements and replacement volumes, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", is enacted as the positive and statutory law of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes.

1996 supplement. The 1996 supplement, hereby designated and declared to be part of the "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", contains:

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1973 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 13;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1980 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 1B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1982 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 16A;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1986 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 3A, 3B, 8A, 8B, 12A, and 12B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1987 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 4B, 6A, and 6B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1988 extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 10A and 10B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1989 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 11A and 11B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1990 regular session of the Colorado General Assembly for volume 15;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1991 first extraordinary session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 5A and 5B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1992 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 2;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1993 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volume 17;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1994 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 4A and 16B;

All the laws of a general and permanent nature enacted after the 1995 regular session of the Colorado general assembly for volumes 9 and 14.

A copy of said supplement, together with a listing of the revisor's changes, has been delivered to each member of the general assembly and is approved and adopted.

The statutory law of the state of Colorado of a general and permanent nature, as corrected, harmonized, collated, edited, revised, and compiled in said "Official Report of the Committee on Legal Services", is enacted as the positive and statutory law of the state of Colorado with the same legal force and effect as, and as part of, Colorado Revised Statutes.

Each supplement is printed and bound in the manner prescribed by the committee on legal services. A copy thereof shall be filed with the secretary of state as part of the records of his office. The date of such filing with the secretary of state shall be the effective date of such reenactments in each supplement as revised statutes.

Source:

L. 76:

Entire section added, p. 321, § 1, effective February 20.

L. 77:

Entire section R&RE, p. 267, § 2, effective May 27.

L. 78:

(1)(c) added, p. 250, § 2, effective May 6.

L. 79:

(1)(d) added, p. 306, § 2, effective April 25.

L. 80:

IP(1) amended and (1)(e) added, p. 443, § 2, effective April 1.

L. 81:

(1)(f) added, p. 349, § 2, effective April 22.

L. 82:

(1)(g) added, p. 223, § 2, effective February 19.

L. 83:

(1)(h) added, p. 383, § 2, effective February 14; IP(1) and (2) amended, p. 382, § 16, effective July 1.

L. 84:

(1)(i) added, p. 282, § 2, effective March 26.

L. 85:

(1)(j) added, p. 292, § 2, effective May 22.

L. 86:

(1)(k) added, p. 429, § 2, effective February 27.

L. 87:

(1)(l) added, p. 352, § 2, effective April 16.

L. 88:

(1)(m) added, p. 323, § 2, effective April 4.

L. 89:

(1)(n) added, p. 343, § 2, effective February 17.

L. 90:

(1)(o) added, p. 340, § 2, effective February 15.

L. 91:

(1)(p) added, p. 1943, § 2, effective April 1.

L. 92:

(1)(q) added, p. 2163, § 2, effective May 20.

L. 93:

(1)(r) added, p. 75, § 2, effective March 26.

L. 94:

(1)(s) added, p. 3, § 2, effective February 4.

L. 95:

(1)(t) added, p. 2, § 2, effective February 22.

L. 96:

(1)(t)(II) amended and (1)(u) added, p. 7, § 2, effective February 13.

L. 97:

(1)(v) added, p. 3, § 2, effective February 20.